Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.135

Hearing prior to appeal required—Conduct of hearing.

Following its receipt of a notice for hearing in accordance with RCW 41.37.130, a hearing shall be held by the director or an authorized representative, in the county of the residence of the claimant at a time and place designated by the director. This hearing shall be conducted and governed in all respects by chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2004 c 242 s 17.]